New Jersey, session 221, A4811.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2024, c.22, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 74 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36 Higher Educational Services 2405 Higher Education Student Assistance Authority GRANTS-IN-AID 45-2405  Student Assistance Programs ............................ $20,000,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Higher Education Student Assistance Authority $20,000,000 Grants-in-Aid: 45    Summer Tuition Aid Grants .............. ($20,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2023, c.34 (C.18A:71B-20a) or of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the amount hereinabove appropriated for Summer Tuition Aid Grants shall be used to provide summer tuition aid grant awards to applicants eligible for summer tuition aid grants pursuant to subsection d. of N.J.S.18A:71B-20 at 75 percent of the maximum amounts for which the applicants qualify pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2023, c.34 (C.18A:71B-20a).  1Summer tuition aid grants may be funded up to 100 percent of the maximum amounts for which the applicants qualify pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2023, c.34 (C.18A:71B-20a), if the Executive Director of the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority projects, as of March 31, 2025, that there are sufficient funds available as surplus in the Tuition Aid Grants account to fund more than 75 percent of the maximum amounts for which the applicants qualify pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2023, c.34 (C.18A:71B-20a).  This projection shall include any unexpended balances reappropriated to the Tuition Aid Grants account at the beginning of the fiscal year.  Based on the projection of available funds, the executive director shall determine the incremental amount necessary to fund summer tuition aid grant awards at a percentage, above 75 percent, of the maximum amounts for which the applicants qualify pursuant to the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2023, c.34 (C.18A:71B-20a), which percentage is to be determined by the executive director.  The incremental amount determined by the executive director shall be transferred from the Tuition Aid Grants account to the Summer Tuition Aid Grants account, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.1 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.